ext/fulltext/data/dicts/german/fulltext.affix
flag *O:
   E[LR]N    > -N,TES
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TES
   [^DMNTW]EN    > -EN,TES
   CHNEN    > -N,TES
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TES
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TES
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TES
   E[LR]N    > -N,TER
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TER
   [^DMNTW]EN    > -EN,TER
   CHNEN    > -N,TER
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TER
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TER
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TER
   E[LR]N    > -N,TEM
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TEM
   [^DMNTW]EN    > -EN,TEM
   CHNEN    > -N,TEM
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TEM
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TEM
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TEM

flag *P:
   .    > EN

flag *Q:
   S    > -S,SSE
   S    > -S,SSEN
   S    > -S,SSES

flag *R:
   [^E]    > ER
   [^E]    > ERN
   E    > R
   E    > RN

flag *S:
   [^Sß]    > S
   ß    > ES
   SS    > ES
   [^S]S    > -S,SES

flag *T:
   .    > ES

flag *W:
   [^IMN]EN    > -EN,
   EIEN    > -EN,
   [^BGHT][MN]EN    > -EN,
   [^C]HNEN    > -EN,
   E[LR]N    > -N,
   [^S]ST    > -ST,
   SST    > -T,
   [^S]T    > -T,

flag *X:
   E[LR]N    > -N,T
   [DTW]EN    > -N,T
   EIEN    > -EN,T
   [^E]IEN    > -N,T
   [^DITMNW]EN    > -EN,T
   CHNEN    > -N,T
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,T
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,T
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,T
   UN    > -N,T
   TST    > -ST,
   E[LR]N    > -N,ST
   [DTW]EN    > -N,ST
   [^DIMNßSTWZX]EN    > -EN,ST
   EIEN    > -EN,ST
   [^E]IEN    > -N,ST
   CHNEN    > -N,ST
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,ST
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,ST
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,ST
   UN    > -N,ST
   [ßSXZ]EN    > -N,ST
   SSEN    > -N,ST
   SCHEN    > -N,ST
   [^SZ]T    > -T,ST
   ZT    > -T,EST

flag *Y:
   E[LR]N    > -N,TE
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TE
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TE
   EIEN    > -EN,TE
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TE
   CHNEN    > -N,TE
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TE
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TE
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TE
   E[LR]N    > -N,TEST
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TEST
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TEST
   EIEN    > -EN,TEST
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TEST
   CHNEN    > -N,TEST
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TEST
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TEST
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TEST
   E[LR]N    > -N,TET
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TET
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TET
   EIEN    > -EN,TET
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TET
   CHNEN    > -N,TET
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TET
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TET
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TET
   E[LR]N    > -N,TEN
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TEN
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TEN
   EIEN    > -EN,TEN
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TEN
   CHNEN    > -N,TEN
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TEN
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TEN
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TEN

flag *Z:
   [^HßSZ]    > ST
   [^C]H    > ST
   [^S]CH    > ST
   [DFKSTZ]    > EST
   CH    > EST
   [AU]ß    > EST
   IEß    > EST
   [IO]SS    > EST
   [^DT]    > T
   [DTGB]    > ET
   E    > N
   IE    > EN
   [^E]    > EN

flag *f:
   PH    > -PH,F
   PH    > -PH,FEN
   PHIE    > -PHIE,FIE
   PHIE    > -PHIE,FIEN

flag *m:
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHER
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHERE
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHEREN
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHEREM
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHERER
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHERES
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTE
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTEN
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTEM
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTEN
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTES
   AH    > -AH,äHER
   AH    > -AH,äHERE
   AH    > -AH,äHEREN
   AH    > -AH,äHEREM
   AH    > -AH,äHERER
   AH    > -AH,äHERES
   AH    > -AH,äHSTE
   AH    > -AH,äHSTEN
   AH    > -AH,äHSTEM
   AH    > -AH,äHSTEN
   AH    > -AH,äHSTES
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTER
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTERE
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTEREN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTEREM
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTERER
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTERES
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTE
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTEN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTEM
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTEN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTES
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGER
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGERE
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGEREN
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGEREM
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGERER
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGERES
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTE
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTEN
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTEM
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTEN
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTES
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSER
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSERE
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSEREN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSEREM
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSERER
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSERES
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTE
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTEN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTEM
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTEN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTES
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSER
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSERE
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSEREN
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSEREM
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSERER
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSERES
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTE
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTEN
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTEM
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTEN
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTES
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGER
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGERE
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGEREN
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGEREM
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGERER
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGERES
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTE
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTEN
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTEM
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTEN
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTES
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKER
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKERE
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKEREN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKEREM
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKERER
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKERES
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTE
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTEN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTEM
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTEN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTES
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKER
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKERE
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKEREN
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKEREM
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKERER
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKERES
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTE
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTEN
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTEM
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTEN
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTES
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMER
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMERE
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMEREN
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMEREM
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMERER
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMERES
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTE
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTEN
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTEM
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTEN
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTES
   ART    > -ART,äRTER
   ART    > -ART,äRTERE
   ART    > -ART,äRTEREN
   ART    > -ART,äRTEREM
   ART    > -ART,äRTERER
   ART    > -ART,äRTERES
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTE
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTEN
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTEM
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTEN
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTES
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSER
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSERE
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSEREN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSEREM
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSERER
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSERES
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTE
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTEM
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTES
   Oß    > -Oß,ößER
   Oß    > -Oß,ößERE
   Oß    > -Oß,ößEREN
   Oß    > -Oß,ößEREM
   Oß    > -Oß,ößERER
   Oß    > -Oß,ößERES
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTE
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTEM
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTES
   OCH    > -OCH,öHER
   OCH    > -OCH,öHERE
   OCH    > -OCH,öHEREN
   OCH    > -OCH,öHEREM
   OCH    > -OCH,öHERER
   OCH    > -OCH,öHERES
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTE
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTEN
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTEM
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTEN
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTES
   UG    > -UG,üGER
   UG    > -UG,üGERE
   UG    > -UG,üGEREN
   UG    > -UG,üGEREM
   UG    > -UG,üGERER
   UG    > -UG,üGERES
   UG    > -UG,üGSTE
   UG    > -UG,üGSTEN
   UG    > -UG,üGSTEM
   UG    > -UG,üGSTEN
   UG    > -UG,üGSTES
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMER
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMERE
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMEREN
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMEREM
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMERER
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMERES
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTE
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTEN
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTEM
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTEN
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTES
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGER
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGERE
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGEREN
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGEREM
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGERER
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGERES
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTE
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTEN
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTEM
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTEN
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTES
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZER
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZERE
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZEREN
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZEREM
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZERER
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZERES
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTE
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTEN
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTEM
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTEN
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTES


flag *n:
   .    > IG
   .    > IGE
   .    > IGER
   .    > IGEN
   .    > IGEM
