ext/fulltext/data/dicts/german/fulltext.dict
abrechnen/DIXY
absorbierend/AEPT
absprach/PZ
abtratst/WX
abzugsfähigen/W
Abzugshebel/NS
Agentenring/EPST
agitieren/DIXY
aktivste/ANRS
Albatros/Qq
anfreundet/EPWX
angesenkte/ANRS
anmietete/NZ
anordnen/DIXY
anschweisstet/WX
anspritzt/EPX
anzutastend/AEPT
Apparat/EPS
Armutszeugnis/Qq
arrangierte/ANRSZ
assemblieren/DIOXY
Attila/S
aufforsten/BDIXY
aufplatzte/NZ
Aufwärtsentwicklung/P
aufwendest/W
aufzählen/DIXY
ausatmen/DIXY
ausgeliehen/AEPT
ausgeschenkte/ANRS
Aushängeschild/R
ausrangierte/ANRSZ
ausschimpfen/DIXY
austreibend/AEPT
Autobiographie/Nf
Bataillonen/W
bedeutet/EPWX
beeinflussen/BDIOXY
begossene/ANRS
Behältnis/Qq
behauptete/ANRSZ
beizumischend/AEPT
bekräftigen/DIOXY
belegend/AEPT
bereitstellende/ANRS
besagen/DIOXY
beschäftigen/DIOXY
Bestellbezeichnungen/W
bestellten/IWX
beteiligen/DIOXY
betrachtete/ANRSZ
Betriebsergebnis/Qq
bewahrte/ANRSZ
Bibliographie/Nf
bimmelt/EPX
Biographie/Nf
Bratspiess/EPT
Bündnis/Qq
China/S
dastehende/ANRS
datiertest/W
debattieren/DIOXY
deklinierend/AEPT
delektieren/DIXY
dementierte/ANRSZ
demolierten/IWX
dispensieren/DIOXY
Doppelbildnis/Qq
draufzahlende/ANRS
dunkelhaarig/AEPT
durchtränkt/AEPTX
Eigentumswohnungen/W
einengbare/ANRS
einfloss/PZp
Eingeständnis/Qq
einkocht/EPX
einprägen/DIXY
einstudieren/DIOXY
einwählt/EPX
einzufügend/AEPT
entgeltfreien/W
entginge/NZ
entrüsten/DIOXY
entschiedenere/ANRSU
entsendete/ANRSZ
entweihten/IWX
ergaunern/DIOWXY
Ergebnis/Qq
erlangen/DIOXY
erneuerte/ANRSZ
erröten/DIOXY
erschwingbar/AEPT
exekutiven/W
explodieren/DIOXY
fälscht/EGPVX
favorisiertet/WX
Februarergebnis/Qq
feinstverteilte/ANRS
flutschende/ANRS
forsch/AEPTZ
forschungsorientiert/AEPT
Frau/MP
friedloseren/W
führen/DIVXY
Fussballereignis/Qq
geflissentliche/ANRS
geizig/ACEPT
Gelenk/EPT
Geograph/Pf
Geschäftsergebnis/Qq
geschäftstüchtigere/ANRS
Gesprächsteilnehmern/W
getickte/ANRS
gezwängt/AEPT
Gleichnis/Qq
Graph/Pf
gratuliert/EPX
Gummiparagraph/Pf
harmonisieren/DIOXY
hässlich/ACEPT
Hauptereignis/Qq
hausierte/NZ
heranrasten/IWX
herausgeforderte/ANRS
herausgelöschte/ANRS
hereinzuholend/AEPT
heruntersetzen/DIXY
hinausgehen/DIX
hineinrede/NZ
Holographie/Nf
hortet/EGPWX
Iltis/Qq
implementationsabhängige/ANRS
injizierend/AEPT
innehab/EP
interessieren/DIOXY
Kaderchef/S
Kalligraph/Pf
Kalligraphie/Nf
kamen/VWX
Kanzelparagraph/Pf
Kartograph/Pf
Kartographie/f
kaskadieren/BDIOXY
kaskadierte/ANRSZ
Klägern/W
kommunikativ/AEPT
kompakte/ACNRS
konjugieren/DIOXY
Konkurrenzverhältnis/Qq
kreisend/AEPT
Kutscher/NS
lachte/NVZ
landeseigenen/W
lausen/DIOXY
Lebensbedürfnis/Qq
liefern/BDIXY
Lithographie/Nf
lizenziert/AEPTX
luftigere/ANRS
Luxusbedürfnis/Qq
Militärbündnis/Qq
missbrauchen/DIOXY
mitberücksichtigtest/W
mitverarbeite/NZ
Mixtur/P
Motor/PS
mutwillig/AEPT
nachjagten/IWX
nachzuweisende/ANRS
niedermähen/DIXY
ominösen/W
Orthographie/Nf
Paragraph/Pf
Personalvorschlag/STp
pfände/NVZ
Pflichtversäumnis/Qq
Pornographie/Nf
posiert/EPX
positivere/ANRS
prägende/ANRS
pudern/IXY
pulverisieren/DIOXY
quetschenden/W
reden/DIXY
reklamiert/AEPTX
revoltierte/NZ
säuberlichere/ANRS
schalldämpfendste/ANRS
Schallverhältnis/Qq
schätzend/AEPT
schildertet/WX
schockieren/DIOXY
schraffiert/AEPTX
Seismograph/Pf
Sicherheitsklauseln/W
slowenische/ANRS
Spaltungsprozesse/NS
Staatsgeheimnis/Qq
stabilisiert/AEPTX
stämmiger/AEPT
stapelten/GIWX
Stenographie/Nf
stimmte/GNVZ
suspendieren/DIOXY
taillieren/DIOXY
Telegraph/Pf
Tiefangriff/EPS
tödlichste/ANRS
Topographie/Nf
Typograph/Pf
Typographie/Nf
überbelastest/W
überbewerten/DIOXY
Überdruckventil/EPS
Übersetzungsverhältnis/Qq
überwältigen/DIOXY
umhacken/DIXY
umschaute/NZ
umschiffte/ANRSZ
umzäuntet/WX
unausrottbar/AEPT
unentspannte/ACNRS
unleidliche/ANRS
untergliedernd/AEPT
Uraltparagraph/Pf
verbreiten/DIOXY
verdächtigere/ANRSU
verdurstetet/WX
vergällen/DIOXY
Vergleich/JST
verhaspelten/IWX
verhehlen/DIOXY
verkohlend/AEPT
vermauerte/ANRSZ
verpatzen/DIOXY
Versäumnis/Qq
verschloss/PZ
verschüchtern/DIOXY
verschweigen/DIWX
versteifen/DIOXY
vorherbestimmen/DIOXY
vornehmlichen/W
vorspringen/DIX
Wachschiff/EPS
waldreichere/ANRS
walzte/GNZ
wattieren/DIOXY
weitergesagt/AEPT
weltumspannend/AEPT
Wetterverhältnis/Qq
zentnerschwere/ANRS
zugucken/DIXY
Zuleitungsventilen/W
zurückgesandt/AEPT
zurückschwenkte/NZ
zusammenklappbare/ANRS
zusammenschliessen/DIX
